New Jersey, session 221, A3675.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Labor and Workforce Development, in consultation with the Department of Health and Department of Human Services, shall establish a multimedia advertising campaign to attract candidates to health care professions.  The campaign shall: (1)   promote health care professions as presenting engaging, dynamic, and rewarding career opportunities; (2)   promote available scholarships, student loan redemption programs, and other available financial support opportunities for those seeking careers in health care professions; and (3)   use a combination of digital outlets, television, radio, print, and other media for its purposes. b.    The department, in developing and administering the general advertising campaign, shall also create targeted advertising to increase the recruitment of health care professionals: (1)   from underrepresented racial groups; and (2)   into high-demand fields, as identified by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development in consultation with the Department of Health and Department of Human Services. 2.    To effectuate the provisions of this act, there is appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development the sum of $1 million which shall be, to the extent permitted by federal law, paid for from monies received by the State under the federal American Rescue Plan (ARP) Act, Pub.L.117-2. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.